Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1232
Owner; displacement from dwelling; additional payment; requirements.

The additional payment authorized by section 76-1231 shall be made only to a displaced person who purchases and occupies a decent, safe, and sanitary replacement dwelling within one year after the date on which such person receives final payment from the displacing agency for the acquired dwelling or the date on which the displacing agency's obligation under subdivision (2)(c) of section 76-1238 is met, whichever is later, except that the displacing agency may extend such period for good cause. If such period is extended, the payment under this section shall be based on the costs of relocating the person to a comparable replacement dwelling within one year of such date.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 19.